Utah statutes.
78B-2-214.   Adverse possession -- Continuous -- Seven years -- Taxes paid.
Adverse possession may not be established unless it is shown that the land has
been occupied and claimed continuously for seven years, and that the party and
the party's predecessors and grantors have paid all taxes which have been
levied and assessed upon the land according to law.
